Idaho statutes. Title 37 FOOD, DRUGS, AND OIL
Chapter 16
IMPORTED FOOD PRODUCTS

Sec.

§ 37-1601 — 37-1603. Meat, poultry, eggs and butter — Label requirements — Notice of sale — Penalty. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1604. Sale of imported food products — Label requirements

Definitions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 140, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-1605. Administration of act

Inspection and sampling. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 140, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-1606. Labeling of products containing imported meat. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 140, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-1607. Injunctive power to enforce law. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 140, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-1608. Duty of county attorneys. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 140, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-1609. Rules and regulations. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 140, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-1610. Penalty. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 140, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.